Hawaii statutes.
§576B-706 Registration of Convention
support order. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, a party
who is an individual or a support enforcement agency seeking recognition of a
Convention support order shall register the order in this State as provided in
Article 6.

(b) Notwithstanding sections 576B-311 and
576B-602(a), a request for registration of a Convention support order shall be
accompanied by:

(1) A complete text of the support order or an
abstract or extract of the support order drawn up by the issuing foreign
tribunal, which may be in the form recommended by the Hague Conference on
Private International Law;

(2) A record stating that the support order is
enforceable in the issuing country;

(3) If the respondent did not appear and was not
represented in the proceedings in the issuing country, a record attesting, as
appropriate, either that the respondent had proper notice of the proceedings
and an opportunity to be heard or that the respondent had proper notice of the
support order and an opportunity to be heard in a challenge or appeal on fact
or law before a tribunal;

(4) A record showing the amount of arrears, if any,
and the date the amount was calculated;

(5) A record showing a requirement for automatic
adjustment of the amount of support, if any, and the information necessary to
make the appropriate calculations; and

(6) If necessary, a record showing the extent to
which the applicant received free legal assistance in the issuing country.

(c) A request for registration of a Convention
support order may seek recognition and partial enforcement of the order.

(d) A tribunal of this State may vacate the
registration of a Convention support order without the filing of a contest
under section 576B-707 only if, acting on its own motion, the tribunal finds
that recognition and enforcement of the order would be manifestly incompatible
with public policy.

(e) The tribunal shall promptly notify the
parties of the registration or the order vacating the registration of a
Convention support order. [L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next